Massachusetts, session 194th, H5440.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the
General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital
asset management and maintenance may convey 2 parcels of land to the town of Bolton. The
parcels to be conveyed formerly served as part of the campus of the Lancaster Industrial School
for Girls and are described as: (i) the Northeast corner of the former Lancaster Industrial School
for Girls, located at 220 Old Common road in the town of Lancaster, that extends into the town
of Bolton on a plan of land entitled “Lancaster Complex South Bolton & Old Common Roads
Lancaster & Bolton, Massachusetts”, prepared by Design Professionals, Inc. and dated
November 2, 2018 which is on file with the division of capital asset management and
of 5

maintenance; and (ii) the Bolton dam in the town of Bolton, located near the Lancaster town line,
as shown on 2 maps on file with the division of capital asset management and maintenance. The
parcels are further described in deeds recorded in the Worcester district registry of deeds in: (a)
book 639, page 254; (b) book 639, page 255; (c) book 549, page 192; (d) book 549, page 194;
and (e) book 2642, page 485. The exact location and boundaries of the parcels to be conveyed
shall be determined by the commissioner after completion of a survey.
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the town of Bolton, acting
by and through its select board, may enter into a purchase and sale agreement, lease or other
agreement to acquire the parcels or acquire rights to the parcels described in subsection (a).
(c) The uses of the 2 parcels described in subsection (a) shall be restricted to general
municipal purposes. The deed or other instrument conveying the parcels to the town of Bolton
shall state that said parcels shall be used solely for general municipal purposes and shall include
a reversionary clause that stipulates that if the parcels cease at any time to be used for such
purposes, then title to the parcel shall, at the election of the commonwealth, revert to the
commonwealth. The reversionary clause shall require that the town of Bolton receive reasonable
notice of and a reasonable time to cure any allegation that either parcel is not being used for
general municipal purposes.
(d) The consideration for the conveyance of the parcels described in subsection (a) shall
be the fair market value of the parcels as determined by the commissioner of capital asset
management and maintenance based upon an independent professional appraisal, taking into
consideration the restriction on the use of the parcels pursuant to subsection (b). The
commissioner shall submit the appraisal to the inspector general for review and comment. The
of 5

inspector general shall review and approve the appraisal and the review shall include an
examination of the methodology utilized for the appraisal. The inspector general shall prepare a
report and file the report with the commissioner. After receiving the report, the commissioner
shall submit copies of the report to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the
joint committee on state administration and regulatory oversight not less than 15 days prior to the
execution of documents affecting the conveyance pursuant to this act.
SECTION 2. (a) Notwithstanding sections 33 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the
General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, if the town of Bolton does not
complete the purchase of the parcels pursuant to section 1 within 180 days of the effective date
of this act or such date thereafter as agreed to by the town of Bolton and the commissioner of
capital asset management and maintenance, then, the commissioner may sell, lease for a term of
up to 99 years, including all renewals and extensions, or otherwise grant, convey or transfer to
purchasers or lessees an interest in the parcels described in section 1, or any portions thereof, on
such other terms and conditions as the commissioner considers appropriate.
(b) The commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance shall use appropriate
competitive bidding processes and procedures when making any disposition pursuant to
subsection (a). Not less than 30 days before the date on which bids, proposals or other offers to
purchase the parcels, or any portion thereof, are due, the commissioner shall place a notice in the
central register published by the state secretary pursuant to section 20A of chapter 9 of the
General Laws stating: (i) the availability of the parcels; (ii) the nature of the competitive bidding
process; (iii) the time, place and manner for the submission of bids and proposals and the
opening of the bids or proposals; and (iv) any other information that the commissioner deems
relevant. The commissioner shall place notice in the central register of the individual or firm
of 5

selected as party to any real property transaction involving the property and the amount of the
transaction.
(c) Any purchase and sale agreement, lease or other document relating to the sale, lease,
transfer or other disposition of the parcels, or any portions thereof, pursuant to this section shall
provide that the commonwealth shall have no liability to any purchaser, lessee, transferee or
successor to any purchaser, lessee or transferee of all or part of the parcels described in
subsection (a) of section 1 for any claims arising out of or related to the conditions, known or
unknown, of the parcels or otherwise in connection with any sale, lease, transfer or other
disposition thereof.
SECTION 3. A deed executed pursuant to sections 1 or 2 may retain or grant rights of
way or easements for access, egress, utilities and drainage across any other portions of the
parcels and the commonwealth may accept from a purchaser rights of way or easements in
roadways or across any portions of the parcels to be conveyed or transferred for access, egress,
drainage and utilities as the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance may
determine necessary and appropriate to carry out this act.
SECTION 4. The purchaser or lessees of the parcels, or any portions thereof, pursuant to
section 2 shall be responsible for all costs and expenses related to the purchase, lease or transfer
of such parcels including, but not limited to, costs associated with surveys, deed preparation and
recording fees as determined by the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance.
SECTION 5. The cash proceeds, pursuant to subsection (a) of section 1 or subsection (a)
of section 2 of the sale of the parcels described in this act or any portion thereof, shall be
deposited into the General Fund.
of 5

SECTION 6. (a) Notwithstanding sections 33 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the
General Laws, chapter 156 of the acts of 2024 or any other general or special law to the contrary,
the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance may convey to the town of
Lancaster, the town of Bolton or a municipal utility serving the town of Lancaster or the town of
Bolton, a portion of the former Lancaster Industrial School for Girls which is described in deeds
recorded in the Worcester district registry of deeds in: (i) book 639, page 254; (ii) book 639,
page 255; (iii) book 549, page 192; (iv) book 549, page 194; and (v) book 2642, page 485 for
well or wellhead protection purposes, including, without limitation, any portion of the former
Lancaster Industrial School for Girls.
(b) Any conveyance made pursuant to subsection (a) shall be on terms and conditions to
be determined by the commissioner; provided, that, if the conveyance is deemed by the
commissioner to be necessary to the development of housing at the former Lancaster Industrial
School for Girls, the commissioner may convey said parcels to the town of Lancaster, the town
of Bolton or a municipal utility serving the town of Lancaster or the town of Bolton for nominal
consideration.
(c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the town of Lancaster may
own real property conveyed by the commissioner pursuant to this section in the town of Bolton
for well or wellhead protection purposes.
of 5